Massachusetts, session 194th, S2161.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection (e) of section 20 of chapter 30A of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the second sentence and inserting in
place thereof the following sentence:-
If a local commission on disability is authorized to utilize remote participation, a physical
quorum of that commission's members shall not be required to be present at the meeting location;
provided, however, that at least one commissioner shall be physically present at the meeting
location.
of 1